Utah statutes.
53-7-208.   Penalty and punishment.

(1)  Any person who violates Sections 53-7-206 and 53-7-207, requiring standard equipment, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  A violator shall be punished by:

(a)  a fine of not less than $25 nor more than $250;

(b)  imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days, nor more than 60 days; or

(c)  both a fine and imprisonment.	

